District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1825

Display of license; change of address.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245, § 26, 40 DCR 660
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1236, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-445.